Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 7 Milk and Milk Products

Cross references.

Imposition of monetary penalty rather than suspension, §

2-2-10

.

Southern Dairy Compact, T. 2, C. 20.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Sanitation, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Agriculture, Milk and Milk Products, Chapter 40-2-4.

Dry Milk, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Agriculture, Milk and Milk Products, Chapter 40-2-6.

Standards for Dry Milk Products, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Agriculture, Milk and Milk Products, Rule 40-2-6-.01.

Ice Cream - Standards and Requirements, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Agriculture, Milk and Milk Products, Chapter 40-2-7.

Ice Cream, Frozen Desserts and Related Products Regulations and Enforcement, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Agriculture, Milk and Milk Products, Chapter 40-2-8.

Ice Cream, Frozen Desserts and Related Products, Sanitation Standards, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Agriculture, Milk and Milk Products, Chapter 40-2-9.

Milk Shake Definitions and Processing Standards, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Agriculture, Milk and Milk Products, Rule 40-2-12-.01.

Pasteurized Milk Ordinance, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Agriculture, Milk and Mild Products, Chapter 40-2-15.

26-2-230.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Dairy Act of 1980.”

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 1.

26-2-231.
[Effective until July 1, 2023. See note.] Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture for the State of Georgia.

“Cream tester” means any person who performs the act of sampling or testing milk, cream, or other dairy products, the test of which is to be used as a basis for making payment for said products.

“Dairy manufacturing plants” means creameries, condenseries, public dairies, butter factories, cheese factories, ice cream factories, and other like factories, and any other concerns that manufacture dairy products for sale at either retail or wholesale; provided, however, that the term dairy manufacturing plant shall not include a retail frozen dessert packager which is otherwise permitted as a food service establishment pursuant to Article 13 of this chapter.

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture of the State of Georgia.

Reserved.

Reserved.

“Manufactured milk products” means those milk products, including condensed, evaporated, concentrated, sterilized, or powdered milk, made from raw whole milk for manufacturing purposes and processed in such a manner and under such conditions as to remove or sterilize, as far as is possible, any contaminated matter contained in the raw milk from which the products were manufactured, under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed to ensure that result.

Reserved.

Reserved.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, firm, company, or corporation.

“Public dairies” means any place where milk and cream are purchased from producers and sold or kept for sale, either at wholesale or retail.

“Raw whole milk for manufacturing purposes” means fluid whole milk in its natural state from healthy cows, which milk has not been produced and handled in compliance with the requirements for Grade A milk.

Reserved.

“Ungraded milk” means all fluid whole milk in its natural state, which milk fails to meet the requirements of Grade A milk or raw whole milk for manufacturing purposes as defined in this article.

Unless otherwise defined in this article, the following words shall have the meanings respectively ascribed to them in the May, 2001, Amended Version of the Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance Recommendations of the United States Public Health Service — Food and Drug Administration and supplements thereto:

“Grade A buttermilk”;

“Grade A chocolate milk”;

“Grade A milk, pasteurized”;

“Grade A modified solids milk”;

“Grade A skim milk”;

“Grade A whole milk”;

“Pasteurization”; and

“Raw cow’s milk.”

Unless otherwise defined in this article, the following words shall have the meanings respectively ascribed to them in “Frozen Desserts,” 21 C.F.R. Sec. 135.3, 21 C.F.R. Sec. 135.110 — 135.160 (1979):

“Ice cream”;

“Frozen custard”;

Reserved;

“Sherbet”; and

“Water ices.”

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, § 2; Code 1933, § 42-502; Ga. L. 1935, p. 167, § 2; Ga. L. 1937, p. 725, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 501, §§ 1, 3-5; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1279, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 638, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1291, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 815, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 26; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 26/HB 90.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 26-2-231 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective until July 1, 2023. For version effective July 1, 2023, see the following version.

The 2015 amendment,

effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised subsection (b) by arranging paragraphs (1) through (8) in alphabetical order.

26-2-231.
[Effective July 1, 2023. See note.] Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture for the State of Georgia.

“Cream tester” means any person who performs the act of sampling or testing milk, cream, or other dairy products, the test of which is to be used as a basis for making payment for said products.

“Dairy manufacturing plants” means creameries, condenseries, public dairies, butter factories, cheese factories, ice cream factories, and other like factories, and any other concerns that manufacture dairy products for sale at either retail or wholesale; provided, however, that the term dairy manufacturing plant shall not include a retail frozen dessert packager which is otherwise permitted as a food service establishment pursuant to Article 13 of this chapter.

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture of the State of Georgia.

Reserved.

Reserved.

“Manufactured milk products” means those milk products, including condensed, evaporated, concentrated, sterilized, or powdered milk, made from raw whole milk for manufacturing purposes and processed in such a manner and under such conditions as to remove or sterilize, as far as is possible, any contaminated matter contained in the raw milk from which the products were manufactured, under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed to ensure that result.

Reserved.

Reserved.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, firm, company, or corporation.

“Public dairies” means any place where milk and cream are purchased from producers and sold or kept for sale, either at wholesale or retail.

“Raw whole milk for manufacturing purposes” means fluid whole milk in its natural state from healthy cows, which milk has not been produced and handled in compliance with the requirements for Grade A milk.

Reserved.

“Ungraded milk” means all fluid whole milk in its natural state, which milk fails to meet the requirements of Grade A milk, raw whole milk for manufacturing purposes as defined in this article, or raw milk for human consumption, as provided for in Article 18 of this chapter.

Unless otherwise defined in this article, the following words shall have the meanings respectively ascribed to them in the May, 2001, Amended Version of the Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance Recommendations of the United States Public Health Service — Food and Drug Administration and supplements thereto:

“Grade A buttermilk”;

“Grade A chocolate milk”;

“Grade A milk, pasteurized”;

“Grade A modified solids milk”;

“Grade A skim milk”;

“Grade A whole milk”;

“Pasteurization”; and

“Raw cow’s milk.”

Unless otherwise defined in this article, the following words shall have the meanings respectively ascribed to them in “Frozen Desserts,” 21 C.F.R. Sec. 135.3, 21 C.F.R. Sec. 135.110 — 135.160 (1979):

“Ice cream”;

“Frozen custard”;

Reserved;

“Sherbet”; and

“Water ices.”

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, § 2; Code 1933, § 42-502; Ga. L. 1935, p. 167, § 2; Ga. L. 1937, p. 725, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 501, §§ 1, 3-5; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1279, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 638, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1291, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 815, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 26; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 26/HB 90; Ga. L. 2022, p. 809, § 3/HB 1175.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 26-2-231 is set out twice in this Code. This version, as set out above, is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, in paragraph (a)(14), substituted “milk, raw whole” for “milk or raw whole” and added “, or raw milk for human consumption, as provided for in Article 18 of this chapter” at the end.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 809, § 1/HB 1175, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Raw Dairy Act.’”

26-2-232.
Duties of Commissioner generally.

The Commissioner is charged with the responsibility of enforcing this article.

It shall be the duty of the Commissioner or his authorized representative:

To inspect or cause to be inspected, as often as may be deemed practicable, all creameries, public dairies, condenseries, butter factories, cheese factories, ice cream factories, or any other places where dairy products are produced, manufactured, kept, handled, stored, or sold;

To prohibit the production, sale, or distribution of unclean or unwholesome milk, cream, butter, cheese, ice cream, or other dairy products;

To condemn for food purposes all unclean or unwholesome dairy products, wherever found;

To take samples anywhere of any dairy product or imitation thereof and cause the same to be analyzed or satisfactorily tested;

To weigh and test milk, cream, and other dairy products for the purpose of ascertaining the percentage and weight of butterfat or other ingredients contained therein; provided, however, that it shall not be necessary for the Commissioner to perform the tests if they are being performed by an agency of the federal government;

To inspect and make tests of any instrument or equipment used in the testing or measuring of milk, cream, or other dairy products; and

To compile and publish in print or electronically annually, or at such shorter intervals as he may desire, statistics and information concerning all phases of the dairy industry in this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, §§ 1, 19; Code 1933, §§ 42-503, 42-501; Ga. L. 1935, p. 167, § 2; Ga. L. 1961, p. 501, § 9; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

26-2-233.
Promulgation and amendment of rules and regulations by Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall have the power to adopt, amend, and repeal rules and regulations to implement and enforce this article; provided, however, that all rules and regulations shall be of uniform application; and provided, further, that all rules and regulations shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Rules and regulations to provide for the labeling of milk and milk products in such manner so as to indicate that the milk or milk product complies with this article and the rules and regulations promulgated under this article;

Rules and regulations to prescribe the specifications of all glassware, including, but not limited to, bottles, pipettes, test tubes, and burrettes, and such other instruments as may be used in the testing of milk, cream, or other dairy products; and

Rules and regulations to prescribe the specifications for the installation and operation of recording thermometers on bulk farm tanks.

The Commissioner may include as a part of such rules and regulations the adoption of supplements to and changes in the “Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance” referred to in Code Section 26-2-238.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, § 19; Code 1933, § 42-501; Ga. L. 1935, p. 167, § 2; Ga. L. 1961, p. 501, § 14; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 737, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 26.

26-2-234.
Applications for licenses and permits; duration of licenses; renewal of licenses; procedure for denial, revocation, or suspension of licenses.

Application for all licenses and permits provided for in this article shall be made to the Commissioner on such forms as he or she may prescribe. All licenses shall be valid for a period of one year unless revoked or suspended as provided in this article. All licenses shall be renewable upon submission of all required application forms. The Commissioner may deny, refuse, suspend, or revoke any license, after notice and a hearing, for any violation of or failure to comply with this article or the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder; provided, however, that the hearing shall be held in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1933, § 42-606, enacted by Ga. L. 1961, p. 501, § 11; Ga. L. 1972, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 6; Ga. L. 2007, p. 103, § 1/HB 112.

26-2-235.
License requirements — Cream testers.

No person shall act as a cream tester unless he or she is licensed, and it shall be unlawful for any person to employ as a cream tester any person who does not have a license to operate testing apparatus for milk and cream. The license shall be posted in a conspicuous place in plain view of all persons entering the room in which all testing is done.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, § 4; Code 1933, § 42-505; Ga. L. 1935, p. 167, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 7; Ga. L. 2007, p. 103, § 2/HB 112.

26-2-236.
[Reserved] License requirements — Operators of milk and cream buying stations.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, § 14; Code 1933, § 42-515; Ga. L. 1935, p. 167, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 8; repealed by Ga. L. 1999, p. 638, § 2, effective July 1, 1999.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 638, § 2 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 1999.

26-2-237.
[Reserved] License requirements — Milk and cream brokers.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, § 15; Code 1933, § 42-520; Ga. L. 1937, p. 725, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 9; repealed by Ga. L. 1999, p. 638, § 3, effective July 1, 1999.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 638, § 3 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 1999.

26-2-238.
Standards and requirements generally.

The standards and requirements of the May, 2005, Amended Version of the Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance Recommendations of the United States Public Health Service — Food and Drug Administration and supplements thereto, except as otherwise provided in this article, are expressly adopted as the standards and requirements for this state. Future changes in and supplements to said milk ordinance may be adopted by the Commissioner as a part of the standards and requirements for this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, § 8; Code 1933, § 42-509; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 10; Ga. L. 1983, p. 737, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 638, § 4; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1291, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 815, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 26; Ga. L. 2004, p. 457, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 178, § 1/SB 441.

26-2-239.
Standards and requirements for frozen desserts generally.

The standards and requirements for standardized frozen desserts, specifically ice cream, frozen custard, sherbet, and water ices, as adopted by the Food and Drug Administration of the United States Department of Health and Human Services and contained in “Frozen Desserts,” 21 C.F.R. Sec. 135.3, 21 C.F.R. Sec. 135.110 — 135.160 (1979), except as otherwise provided, are expressly adopted as the standards and requirements for this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-612, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 12; Ga. L. 1999, p. 638, § 5.

26-2-240.
Adulterated ice cream.

Ice cream shall be deemed to be adulterated:

If it contains any preservative, mineral, or other substance or compound deleterious to health; provided, however, that this Code section shall not be construed to prohibit the use of harmless coloring matter when not used for fraudulent purposes;

If it contains any fats other than milk fat or any oils or paraffin added to, blended with, or compounded with it; provided, however, that chocolate ice cream and the chocolate coating of coated ice cream may contain cocoa butter; or

If it is made, in whole or in part, from any milk product which is unfit for consumption as food.

It shall be unlawful for any person to manufacture, sell, offer or expose for sale, or have in possession with intent to sell or offer or expose for sale under the name of “ice cream” any product or substance deemed adulterated under subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, § 11; Code 1933, § 42-512; Ga. L. 1965, p. 498, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 13.

26-2-241.
Testing of milk, cream, or other dairy products.

In determining the value of milk, cream, or other dairy products by the use of the Babcock test, it shall be unlawful to give any false reading or in any way manipulate the test so as to give a higher or lower percent of butterfat than the milk, cream, or other dairy products actually contain, or to cause any inaccuracy in reading the percent of butterfat by securing from any quantity of milk, cream, or other dairy products to be tested an inaccurate sample for the test. None other than the Babcock method, or such method of testing as may be approved by the Commissioner, may be employed when testing milk or cream, the test of which is to be used as a basis for making payment for the milk or cream thus tested. None other than the torsion balanced scales, or such scales as may be approved by the Commissioner, may be used when weighing cream for testing, when the tests are to be used as a basis for making payment for cream. It shall be unlawful to use adjustable scale weights in determining the weight of cream used in the Babcock test. Only such centrifuge shall be used as shall meet the approval of the Commissioner. Specifications for apparatus and chemicals and directions for testing milk and cream must conform to

Standard Methods for the Examination of Dairy Products,

with such additions as shall be deemed advisable by the Commissioner to make them conform to this article. All test tubes, bottles, pipettes, burettes, or instruments used in connection with testing or determining the value of milk, cream, or other dairy products by the use of the Babcock test must be United States government standard and shall be approved by the Commissioner. All milk and cream tests shall be maintained at a temperature of 135 to 140 degrees Fahrenheit for at least three minutes before the reading of the percent of butterfat shall be made and recorded. In reading cream tests, glymol or its equivalent must be used, and the samples under test must be held for three minutes in a water bath extending up as high on the graduated neck as the sample itself does.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, § 3; Code 1933, § 42-504; Ga. L. 1935, p. 167, § 2; Ga. L. 1951, p. 444, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 628, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 11; Ga. L. 1999, p. 638, § 6.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, “burettes” was substituted for “burrettes” in the seventh sentence.

26-2-242.
[Effective until July 1, 2023. See note.] Standards and requirements as to sale of milk and milk products generally; labeling; sale of ungraded milk, raw whole milk, condensed or evaporated milk.

Milk and milk products which are in compliance with this article and in compliance with the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article may be sold, offered for sale, or delivered to the consuming public for the purpose of human consumption, provided the container in which the milk or milk product is sold, offered for sale, or delivered has affixed thereto or printed thereon labels approved by the Commissioner. No milk or milk product may be sold, offered for sale, or delivered for the purpose of human consumption if it is not in compliance with this article or the standards or rules and regulations prescribed pursuant to this article.

The sale, offering for sale, or delivery of ungraded milk is prohibited.

No raw whole milk for manufacturing purposes may be offered for sale in this state to anyone except processors and manufacturers properly licensed and inspected to manufacture and process manufactured milk products.

It shall be unlawful to sell, keep for sale, or offer for sale any condensed or evaporated milk, concentrated milk, sweetened condensed milk, sweetened evaporated milk, sweetened concentrated milk, sweetened evaporated skimmed milk, or any of the fluid derivatives of any of them, to which shall have been added any fat or oil other than milk fat, either under the name of the products or articles or the derivatives thereof, or under any fictitious or trade name whatsoever.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-614, enacted by Ga. L. 1961, p. 501, §§ 6, 7; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 14.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 26-2-242 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective until July 1, 2023. For version effective July 1, 2023, see the following version.

26-2-242.
[Effective July 1, 2023. See note.] Standards and requirements as to sale of milk and milk products generally; labeling; sale of ungraded milk, raw whole milk, condensed or evaporated milk.

Milk and milk products which are in compliance with this article and in compliance with the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article may be sold, offered for sale, or delivered to the consuming public for the purpose of human consumption, provided the container in which the milk or milk product is sold, offered for sale, or delivered has affixed thereto or printed thereon labels approved by the Commissioner. No milk or milk product may be sold, offered for sale, or delivered for the purpose of human consumption if it is not in compliance with this article or the standards or rules and regulations prescribed pursuant to this article unless such product complies with the standards and requirements of Article 18 of this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

The sale, offering for sale, or delivery of ungraded milk is prohibited except as provided in Article 18 of this chapter.

No raw whole milk for manufacturing purposes may be offered for sale in this state to anyone except processors and manufacturers properly licensed and inspected to manufacture and process manufactured milk products.

It shall be unlawful to sell, keep for sale, or offer for sale any condensed or evaporated milk, concentrated milk, sweetened condensed milk, sweetened evaporated milk, sweetened concentrated milk, sweetened evaporated skimmed milk, or any of the fluid derivatives of any of them, to which shall have been added any fat or oil other than milk fat, either under the name of the products or articles or the derivatives thereof, or under any fictitious or trade name whatsoever.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-614, enacted by Ga. L. 1961, p. 501, §§ 6, 7; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 14; Ga. L. 2022, p. 809, § 4/HB 1175.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 26-2-242 is set out twice in this Code. This version, as set out above, is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, added “unless such product complies with the standards and requirements of Article 18 of this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder” at the end of subsection (a) and added “except as provided in Article 18 of this chapter” at the end of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 809, § 1/HB 1175, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Raw Dairy Act.’”

26-2-243.
[Effective until July 1, 2023. See note.] Intermingling of Grade A milk or milk products with other grades; inspections; permit requirements; enforcement powers of Commissioner.

It is the intent and purpose of this Code section to prohibit the intermingling of Grade A milk and Grade A milk products with milk and milk products other than Grade A.

No person producing, handling, processing, manufacturing, or dealing in milk or milk products, which person produces, receives, distributes, or in any manner handles Grade A raw whole milk, Grade A pasteurized whole milk, or Grade A milk products, shall receive, store, handle, distribute, or otherwise allow raw whole milk for manufacturing purposes to be introduced upon the premises where the operations are conducted. At all times, such person shall be subject to inspection by the Commissioner and shall hold a Grade A permit, issued by the Commissioner, to deal in Grade A milk and Grade A milk products and shall conduct business pursuant to the laws of this state and the rules and regulations of the Commissioner made thereunder, to the end that milk products shall be handled only in the manner provided for in this article and that inferior quality milk not be sold to the consuming public as superior quality milk.

No person producing, handling, processing, manufacturing, or dealing in milk or milk products, which person produces, receives, distributes, or in any manner handles raw whole milk for manufacturing purposes, shall introduce any Grade A raw whole milk, Grade A pasteurized milk, or Grade A milk products for other than manufacturing purposes upon the premises where manufactured milk products operations are conducted. At all times such persons shall be subject to inspection by the Commissioner and shall hold a manufacturing permit, issued by the Commissioner, to deal in manufactured milk products and shall conduct business pursuant to the laws of this state and the rules and regulations of the Commissioner made thereunder, to the end that grades of milk shall be handled only in the manner provided for in this article and that inferior quality milk not be sold to the consuming public as superior quality milk.

The prohibitions contained in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section shall not be applicable where separate systems and other facilities are provided to maintain the separation and identity of the various grades and types of milk.

After making inspections or conducting appropriate tests, if the Commissioner determines that any law, rule, or regulation has been violated or if he has reason to believe that any of the milk or milk products enumerated in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section are dangerous for human consumption, the Commissioner, after notice, is authorized to place one or more inspectors on such premises upon a 24 hour basis for such a period of time as he deems necessary to satisfy himself that the laws and rules and regulations are being complied with. The cost of the inspection, to be fixed by the Commissioner at a cost not to exceed the actual cost of the inspection, shall be paid by such person to the Commissioner as a condition to the continued validity of the permit or the license under which the business is operated. The inspection charges provided in this subsection may be terminated by a request to the Commissioner for a hearing within two days after a charge of violation or the placing of the inspectors in the plant. Upon hearing and for cause shown, the Commissioner is authorized to impose the cost of inspection as a part of the penalty imposed. Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the Commissioner from revoking or canceling any permit or license of any person doing business in this state who violates any of the laws of this state or the regulations made pursuant thereto.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, § 19; Code 1933, § 42-501; Ga. L. 1935, p. 167, § 2; Ga. L. 1961, p. 501, § 11; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1988, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 15.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 26-2-243 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective until July 1, 2023. For version effective July 1, 2023, see the following version.

26-2-243.
[Effective July 1, 2023. See note.] Intermingling of Grade A milk or milk products with other grades; inspections; permit requirements; enforcement powers of Commissioner.

It is the intent and purpose of this Code section to prohibit the intermingling of Grade A milk and Grade A milk products with milk and milk products other than Grade A.

No person producing, handling, processing, manufacturing, or dealing in milk or milk products, which person produces, receives, distributes, or in any manner handles Grade A raw whole milk, Grade A pasteurized whole milk, or Grade A milk products, shall receive, store, handle, distribute, or otherwise allow raw milk for human consumption or raw whole milk for manufacturing purposes to be introduced upon the premises where the operations are conducted. At all times, such person shall be subject to inspection by the Commissioner and shall hold a Grade A permit, issued by the Commissioner, to deal in Grade A milk and Grade A milk products and shall conduct business pursuant to the laws of this state and the rules and regulations of the Commissioner made thereunder, to the end that milk products shall be handled only in the manner provided for in this article and that inferior quality milk not be sold to the consuming public as superior quality milk.

No person producing, handling, processing, manufacturing, or dealing in milk or milk products, which person produces, receives, distributes, or in any manner handles raw whole milk for manufacturing purposes, shall introduce any Grade A raw whole milk, Grade A pasteurized milk, or Grade A milk products for other than manufacturing purposes upon the premises where manufactured milk products operations are conducted. At all times such persons shall be subject to inspection by the Commissioner and shall hold a manufacturing permit, issued by the Commissioner, to deal in manufactured milk products and shall conduct business pursuant to the laws of this state and the rules and regulations of the Commissioner made thereunder, to the end that grades of milk shall be handled only in the manner provided for in this article and that inferior quality milk not be sold to the consuming public as superior quality milk.

The prohibitions contained in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section shall not be applicable where separate systems and other facilities are provided to maintain the separation and identity of the various grades and types of milk.

After making inspections or conducting appropriate tests, if the Commissioner determines that any law, rule, or regulation has been violated or if he has reason to believe that any of the milk or milk products enumerated in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section are dangerous for human consumption, the Commissioner, after notice, is authorized to place one or more inspectors on such premises upon a 24 hour basis for such a period of time as he deems necessary to satisfy himself that the laws and rules and regulations are being complied with. The cost of the inspection, to be fixed by the Commissioner at a cost not to exceed the actual cost of the inspection, shall be paid by such person to the Commissioner as a condition to the continued validity of the permit or the license under which the business is operated. The inspection charges provided in this subsection may be terminated by a request to the Commissioner for a hearing within two days after a charge of violation or the placing of the inspectors in the plant. Upon hearing and for cause shown, the Commissioner is authorized to impose the cost of inspection as a part of the penalty imposed. Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the Commissioner from revoking or canceling any permit or license of any person doing business in this state who violates any of the laws of this state or the regulations made pursuant thereto.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, § 19; Code 1933, § 42-501; Ga. L. 1935, p. 167, § 2; Ga. L. 1961, p. 501, § 11; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1988, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 15; Ga. L. 2022, p. 809, § 5/HB 1175.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 26-2-243 is set out twice in this Code. This version, as set out above, is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, inserted “raw milk for human consumption or” in the first sentence in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 809, § 1/HB 1175, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Raw Dairy Act.’”

26-2-244.
Standards and conditions for importation of milk and milk products.

No milk or milk products for human consumption shall be shipped into this state from any other state unless such milk or milk product is produced and handled under sanitary conditions no less adequate for the protection of public health and welfare than the conditions under which milk and milk products are produced, handled, and marketed in this state, and then not until authorization for the shipping of milk or milk products has been issued by the Commissioner after careful investigation; provided, however, that shippers listed on the interstate milk shippers list shall be deemed to be in compliance with this Code section.

Any applicant who is not listed on the interstate milk shippers list but who desires to ship milk or milk products into this state shall furnish certified copies of all laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to the sanitary standards in force in the area where the product which he wishes to bring into this state is produced, processed, handled, and sold, together with certified copies of any and all licenses, permits, certificates, test results, and inspection reports pertaining to the production, processing, marketing, handling, and sale of the milk or milk products. If the Commissioner finds that the milk or milk product is produced, processed, marketed, and handled under sanitary conditions no less adequate than those applicable in this state, he may authorize the shipping of the milk or milk product into this state. If the applicant is unable to comply with this subsection, he may request an inspection under subsection (c) of this Code section.

Upon application from a person who desires authorization to ship any milk or milk product into this state and upon the payment by the person of the amount of actual expense necessary to make an inspection, the Commissioner shall cause an inspection to be made. If, upon inspection, the requirements of this article and the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder are found to be met, the Commissioner shall authorize the shipment of the milk or milk product.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, § 20; Code 1933, § 42-518; Ga. L. 1937, p. 725, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 501, § 12; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 17.

26-2-245.
Condemnation and coloring of milk and milk products produced, processed, or delivered in violation of laws of state.

Any milk or milk product shipped into this state or produced, processed, or delivered in this state in violation of the laws of this state or the rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner pursuant thereto shall be condemned by the Commissioner and may be rendered unfit for marketing by the addition of a pyoktanin solution or other approved harmless coloring matter to notify the consuming public that the milk or milk product is ungraded and unfit for human consumption.

History.

Code 1933, § 42-618, enacted by Ga. L. 1937, p. 725, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 501, § 8; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 18.

26-2-246.
Furnishing of records by persons operating under article.

Any person operating under this article shall furnish, upon the request of the Commissioner, such data and statistics as he may require.

All persons operating under this article shall keep complete and accurate records of their operations, and the Commissioner shall have free access to all such records.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, §§ 9, 16; Code 1933, §§ 42-510, 42-517; Ga. L. 1935, p. 167, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 4.

26-2-247.
Enforcement of article generally.

The Commissioner shall be charged with the enforcement of this article; and he shall have the power and authority, in connection with this and other provisions dealing with milk, food, or food products, to revoke or cancel the permit or license of any person doing business in this state who violates the laws of this state or the rules and regulations made pursuant thereto.

The enforcement methods authorized by this article shall be cumulative of those provided otherwise by law, and the same are not superseded by this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, § 19; Code 1933, § 42-501; Ga. L. 1935, p. 167, § 2; Ga. L. 1961, p. 501, § 11; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1988, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 15.

26-2-248.
Injunctions.

Any person, firm, or corporation subject to this article and the other milk laws of this state who violates any of said provisions or any valid rules and regulations made thereunder may be enjoined from such continued violation. The Commissioner is authorized to apply for, and for cause shown the superior court having jurisdiction of the defendant in any such action may grant, injunctive relief, by interlocutory injunction, permanent injunction, or temporary restraining order, as the circumstances may warrant. The proceeding may be maintained notwithstanding the pendency of any civil action and notwithstanding the pendency of or conviction in a criminal proceeding arising from the same transaction. Such action may be maintained without bond. The purpose of this Code section is to create a statutory cause of action by way of injunction, and the Commissioner is authorized to bring such proceedings in the same form and manner and in the same court as other equitable proceedings may be brought. This remedy is not exclusive but is cumulative of other remedies afforded to protect the consuming public from unwholesome products which are economic frauds.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, § 19; Code 1933, § 42-501; Ga. L. 1935, p. 167, § 2; Ga. L. 1961, p. 501, § 11; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1988, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 15.